Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Applicability.

Sec. 34.08.010.
Applicability generally.

Except as provided in AS

34.08.030

, this chapter applies to each common interest community created within the state after January 1, 1986.
The provisions of AS 10.15 and AS 34.07 do not apply to common interest communities created after January 1, 1986.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.08.020.
Applicability to small cooperatives. [Repealed, § 10 ch 61 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 34.08.030.
Applicability to limited expense liability planned communities.

If a planned community created after January 1, 1986, is not subject to any development rights and provides, in its declaration, that the annual average common expense liability of all units restricted to residential purposes, exclusive of optional user fees and any insurance premiums paid by the association, may not exceed $100, as adjusted under AS

34.08.820

, the planned community is subject only to AS

34.08.720

—

34.08.740

unless the declaration provides that the entire chapter is applicable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 61 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.08.035.
Prohibited subdivisions.

A declarant may not subdivide real property under single ownership into two or more common interest communities to avoid the application of this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 61 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.08.040.
Applicability to preexisting common interest communities.

Except as provided in AS

34.08.050

, the provisions of AS

34.08.110

,

34.08.120

,

34.08.290

,

34.08.320(a)(1)

— (6) and (11) — (16),

34.08.420

,

34.08.470

,

34.08.490

,

34.08.510

,

34.08.590

,

34.08.670

,

34.08.720

,

34.08.730

,

34.08.740

, and

34.08.990

, to the extent necessary in construing any of those sections, apply to all common interest communities created in the state before January 1, 1986, except that the sections apply only with respect to events and circumstances occurring after January 1, 1986, and do not invalidate existing provisions of the declaration, bylaws, or plats or plans of the common interest communities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 61 SLA 1986)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 61, SLA 1986 provides that “in a condominium or cooperative created after January 1, 1986, and before September 1, 1986, the provisions of AS

34.08.040

apply to events and occurrences concerning the condominium or cooperative occurring after September 1, 1986.”

Sec. 34.08.050.
Applicability to small preexisting cooperatives and planned communities.

If a cooperative or planned community created within the state before January 1, 1986 contains no more than 12 units and is not subject to any development rights, it is subject only to AS

34.08.720

—

34.08.740

, unless the declaration is amended in conformity with law and with the procedures and requirements of the declaration to take advantage of the provisions of AS

34.08.060

, in which case all the sections enumerated in AS

34.08.040

apply to the cooperative or planned community.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.060.
Amendments to governing instruments.

In amendments to the declaration, bylaws, or plats and plans of a common interest community created before January 1, 1986,

if the result accomplished by the amendment was permitted by law prior to this chapter, the amendment may be made either in accordance with the former law, in which case that law applies to that amendment, or it may be made under this chapter; and

if the result accomplished by the amendment is permitted by this chapter and was not permitted by law before January 1, 1986, the amendment may be made under this chapter.

An amendment to the declaration, bylaws, or plats and plans authorized by this chapter must be adopted in conformity with law and with the procedures and requirements specified by the declaration, bylaws, or plats and plans. If an amendment grants a person any right, power, or privilege permitted by this chapter, each correlative obligation, liability, and restriction in this chapter also applies to the person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.070.
Applicability to nonresidential common interest communities.

With the exception of AS

34.08.720

—

34.08.740

, this chapter does not apply to a common interest community in which each unit is restricted exclusively to nonresidential use unless the declaration provides that the chapter does apply to the common interest community.

This chapter applies to a common interest community containing some units that are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use and other units that are not restricted exclusively to nonresidential use only if the declaration provides that the chapter applies to the common interest community or the real estate comprising the units that may be used for residential purposes would be a common interest community in the absence of the units that may not be used for residential purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.080.
Applicability to out-of-state common interest communities.

This chapter does not apply to a common interest community or unit located outside the state, but AS

34.08.520

—

34.08.580

apply to a contract for the disposition of a common interest community or unit that is signed in the state by a party unless the disposition is exempt under AS

34.08.510(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)